Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,125
Repealed. Laws 2023, LB705, § 135. Operative date July 1, 2024. Master Teacher Program; created; purpose.

The Master Teacher Program is created. The purpose of the program is to build a group of recognized teachers of high achievement in the teaching profession. The State Department of Education shall administer the program.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 8.